Washington statutes.
RCW 41.76.065

Strikes and lockouts prohibited—Violations—Remedies.

The right of faculty to engage in any strike is prohibited. The right of a board of regents or trustees to engage in any lockout is prohibited. Should either a strike or lockout occur, the representative of the faculty or board of regents or trustees may invoke the jurisdiction of the superior court in the county in which the labor dispute exists, and such court has jurisdiction to issue an appropriate order against either or both parties. In fashioning an order, the court shall take into consideration not only the elements necessary for injunctive relief but also the purpose and goals of this chapter and any mitigating factors such as the commission of an unfair labor practice by either party.

[ 2002 c 356 s 16.]